Utah statutes.
35A-3-114.   Programs for displaced homemakers.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "displaced homemaker" means an individual:
(a)  who has been a homemaker for a period of eight or more years without
significant gainful employment outside the home;
(b)  whose primary occupation during the period of time described in
Subsection (1)(a) was the provision of unpaid household services for family
members;
(c)  who has found it necessary to enter the job market;
(d)  who is not reasonably capable of obtaining employment sufficient to
provide self-support or necessary support for dependents, due to a lack of
marketable job skills or other skills necessary for self-sufficiency; and
(e)  who has depended on:
(i)  the income of a family member and lost that income; or
(ii)  governmental assistance as the parent of dependent children and is no
longer eligible for that assistance.
(2)  The department shall establish, in cooperation with state and local
governmental agencies, community-based organizations, and private employers, a
program for the education, training, and transitional counseling of displaced
homemakers, which includes referral services and the following services:
(a)  employment and skills training, career counseling, and placement services
specifically designed to address the needs of displaced homemakers;
(b)  assistance in obtaining access to existing public and private employment
training programs;
(c)  educational services, including information on high school or college
programs, or assistance in gaining access to existing educational programs;
(d)  health education and counseling, or assistance in gaining access to
existing health education and counseling services;
(e)  financial management services which provide information on insurance,
taxes, estate and probate matters, mortgages, loans, and other financial
issues; and
(f)  prevocational self-esteem and assertiveness training.
(3)  The department shall:
(a) (i)  contract with existing governmental or private agencies or community-
based organizations that have demonstrated effectiveness in serving displaced
homemakers to provide a program for displaced homemakers in each county or
group of counties, as the population demands; or
(ii) establish a program for displaced homemakers in that area;
(b)  coordinate its program for displaced homemakers with existing state or
federal programs of a similar nature and, where possible, utilize existing
physical resources;
(c)  establish rules to implement this section, and may form an advisory
committee for recommendations on the establishment and improvement of a
program for displaced homemakers;
(d)  encourage the placement of displaced homemakers in programs established
under:
(i)  the Workforce Investment Act of 1998; and
(ii) the Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act, 20
U.S.C. Section 2301, et seq.; and
(e)  prepare an evaluation of its program for displaced homemakers, including
the success of placement of displaced homemakers in programs described in this
section, and annually submit a written report of that evaluation to the
Legislature.
(4)  Displaced homemakers may act as peer counselors in programs for displaced
homemakers.
(5) (a)  Appropriate funds received by the state under Section 17-16-21 shall
be deposited as nonlapsing dedicated credits and used for the purposes of this
section.
(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (5)(a), if the nonlapsing amount exceeds
$300,000 at the end of any fiscal year, the excess shall lapse into the
General Fund.
(6)  The department shall establish procedures for payment and repayment, when
possible, by clients to the department of the costs of services provided to
displaced homemakers under this section.
